District of Columbia statutes.
16-1354

Distribution of money deposited on declaration of taking; judgment for deficiency.

After the filing of the declaration of taking, and the deposit of the money in the registry of the court, as provided for by section 16-1353 , the court, upon the application of the parties in interest, may order that the money so deposited, or any part thereof, be paid forthwith for or on account of the just compensation to be awarded in the proceeding. Upon the final award of compensation, the court shall enter judgment for the amount of any deficiency in the manner provided by rule 71A (j) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 578, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 10(r), 45 DCR 745

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1354.
1973 Ed., § 16-1354.